Washington statutes.
RCW 43.03.030

Increase or reduction of appointees' compensation.

(1) Wherever the compensation of any appointive state officer or employee is fixed by statute, it may be hereafter increased or decreased in the manner provided by law for the fixing of compensation of other appointive state officers or employees; but this subsection shall not apply to the heads of state departments.

(2) Wherever the compensation of any state officer appointed by the governor, or of any employee in any office or department under the control of any such officer, is fixed by statute, such compensation may hereafter, from time to time, be changed by the governor, and he or she shall have power to fix such compensation at any amount not to exceed the amount fixed by statute.

(3) From February 18, 2009, through June 30, 2013, a salary or wage increase shall not be granted to any position under this section, except that increases may be granted for positions for which the employer has demonstrated difficulty retaining qualified employees if the following conditions are met:

(a) The salary increase can be paid within existing resources;

(b) The salary increase will not adversely impact the provision of client services; and

(c) For any state agency of the executive branch, not including institutions of higher education, the salary increase is approved by the director of the office of financial management.

Any agency granting a salary increase from February 15, 2010, through June 30, 2011, to a position exempt under this section shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than July 31, 2011, detailing the positions for which salary increases were granted, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the increases.

Any agency granting a salary increase from July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2013, to a position exempt under this section shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by July 31, 2012, and July 31, 2013, detailing the positions for which salary increases were granted during the preceding fiscal year, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the increases.

From July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013, salaries for all positions under this section are subject to RCW 41.04.820.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 39 s 7; 2010 c 1 s 4; 2009 c 549 s 5007; 2009 c 5 s 4; 1965 c 8 s 43.03.030. Prior: (i) 1921 c 49 s 1; RRS s 10896. (ii) 1933 c 47 s 1; RRS s 10976-1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 39: See note following RCW 41.04.820.

Effective date—2010 c 1: See note following RCW 41.06.070.

Effective date—2009 c 5: See note following RCW 41.06.070.